Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB331.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In addition to any other requirement of state or federal law, all sales, exchanges,
or transfers of firearms shall be conducted in accordance with this section unless
the sale, exchange, or transfer is:
(a) Conducted by a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, or licensed
dealer, as those terms are defined in 18 U.S.C. secs. 921 and 922, when the
sale, exchange, or transfer is conducted pursuant to that person's federal
firearms license; or
(b) Between spouses, parents, children, and stepchildren in the same immediate
family.
(2) Before any sale, exchange, or transfer pursuant to this section, a national instant
background check shall be completed by a dealer who consents to conduct the
check, and upon completion of the background check, the dealer shall complete a
form developed by the Department of Kentucky State Police, and available for
download through the department's website, that identifies and confirms that the
check was performed.
(3) All dealers shall maintain a record of transactions and background checks
conducted pursuant to this section, and the records shall be maintained on the
premises identified and described in the dealer's license, and shall be available at
all reasonable hours for inspection by any peace officer acting within the scope of
his or her duties.
(4) A dealer may require that any background check conducted pursuant to this
section be subject to a fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10) per transaction.
(5) Any record produced pursuant to this section and any transmission thereof to any
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/22/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1249
government agency shall not be considered a public record for purposes of the
Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
Section 2. KRS 237.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 237.030 to 237.050 shall be
guilty of a Class D felony.
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 237.030 to 237.050, and in
so doing uses any destructive device or booby trap device to avoid detection by law
enforcement or other government personnel or to avoid theft or detection by any
other person, of any controlled substance as set forth in KRS Chapter 218A and
held in violation of KRS 218A.140, shall be guilty of a Class C felony.
(3) Any person who knowingly violates Section 1 of this Act shall be guilty of a Class
A misdemeanor.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/22/2025 10:38 AM Jacketed